New Mexico, session 2026, HB140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of finance and administration for expenditure by the New Mexico mortgage finance authority in fiscal year 2027 and subsequent fiscal years for the oversight duties required by the provisions of the Affordable Housing Act. Any unexpended or unencumbered balance remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund. .232397.1SA